Hawaii statutes.
§805-11 Same; trial. At the appointed
time in the summons the district judge shall proceed to hear and try the case
as in the case of a natural person. [L 1893-4, c 24, §3; RL 1925, §4015; RL
1935, §5478; RL 1945, §10778; RL 1955, §257-11; HRS §710-11; am L 1970, c 188,
§39; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next